New York, session 2025-2026, A4263.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph a of subdivision 3 of 2 section 667 of the education law, as amended by section 1 of part X of 3 chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (ii) Except for students as noted in subparagraph (iii) of this para- 5 graph, the base amount as determined from subparagraph (i) of this para- 6 graph, shall be reduced in relation to income as follows: 7 Amount of income Schedule of reduction 8 of base amount 9 (A) Less than seven thousand None 10 dollars 11 (B) Seven thousand dollars or Seven per centum of excess 12 more, but less than eleven over seven thousand dollars 13 thousand dollars 14 (C) Eleven thousand dollars or Two hundred eighty dollars 15 more, but less than eighteen plus ten per centum of excess 16 thousand dollars over eleven thousand dollars 17 (D) Eighteen thousand dollars or Nine hundred eighty dollars 18 more, but not more than one plus twelve per centum of 19 hundred [twenty-five] excess over eighteen 20 fifty thousand dollars 21 thousand dollars 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 23 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06526-01-5